Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 25 Campaign Practices

Cross references. —

For provision making this chapter applicable to municipal elections, see §

22-23-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 352 to 355, 449 to 468.

Solicitation or receipt of funds by public officer or employee for political campaign expenses or similar purposes as bribery, 55 ALR2d 1137.

Validity and construction of orders and enactments requiring public officers and employees, or candidates for office, to disclose financial condition, interests, or relationships, 22 ALR4th 237.

Validity, construction and application of provisions of Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971 (2 U.S.C. §§ 431 to 454) pertaining to disclosure of campaign funds, 18 ALR Fed 949.

Validity, construction and application of 42 U.S.C. § 1973i(c) making it federal offense with respect to federal elections to give false information in registering or voting or to pay or accept payment for registering or voting, 23 ALR Fed 463.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 337 to 353.

§ 22-25-101.
Definitions; statement of formation.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

A political action committee and a candidate’s campaign committee, except those formed under federal law, shall file a statement of formation within ten (10) days after formation. This filing is required when any political action committee or candidate’s campaign committee is formed, whether before an election to aid in the campaign or formed after an election to defray campaign debts incurred. The chairman and treasurer of a committee shall be separate individuals. The statement of formation shall list the name and mailing address of the committee, name and address of the committee chairman and treasurer, date committee formed and the purpose of committee. The statement of formation shall be filed in those offices as provided by W.S.

22-25-107

.

Any organization that receives contributions or expends funds totaling in aggregate more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for the purpose of causing independent expenditures or electioneering communications to be made shall file a statement of formation for the purpose of filing campaign reports in accordance with W.S. 22-25-106(h). Any organization that has not previously filed a statement of formation that is required by this subsection shall file a statement of formation within ten (10) days of causing or intending to cause the independent expenditure or electioneering communication to be made in any primary, general or special election or within twenty-four (24) hours if the independent expenditure or electioneering communication is made within ten (10) days of any primary, general or special election. The statement of formation as referenced in this subsection shall be filed in those offices as provided by W.S.

22-25-107

and shall list the:

Name and mailing address of the organization;

Name and mailing address of the organization’s chairman and treasurer, if applicable, or the organization’s designee;

Date the organization formed; and

Purpose of the organization.

As used in this chapter:

“Electioneering communication” means, except as otherwise provided by paragraph (ii) of this subsection, any communication, including an advertisement, which is publicly distributed as a billboard, brochure, email, mailing, magazine, pamphlet or periodical, as the component of an internet website or newspaper or by the facilities of a cable television system, electronic communication network, internet streaming service, radio station, telephone or cellular system, television station or satellite system and which:

Refers to or depicts a clearly identified candidate for nomination or election to public office or a clearly identified ballot proposition and which does not expressly advocate the nomination, election or defeat of the candidate or the adoption or defeat of the ballot proposition;

Can only be reasonably interpreted as an appeal to vote for or against the candidate or ballot proposition;

Is made within thirty (30) calendar days of a primary election, sixty (60) calendar days of a general election or twenty-one (21) calendar days of any special election during which the candidate or ballot proposition will appear on the ballot; and

Is targeted to the electors in the geographic area:

The candidate would represent if elected; or

Affected by the ballot proposition.

“Electioneering communication” does not mean:

A communication made by an entity as a component of a newsletter or other internal communication of the entity which is distributed only to members or employees of the entity;

A communication consisting of a news report, commentary or editorial or a similar communication, protected by the first amendment to the United States constitution and article 1, section 20 of the Wyoming constitution, which is distributed as a component of an email, internet website, magazine, newspaper or periodical or by the facilities of a cable television system, electronic communication network, internet streaming service, radio station, television station or satellite system;

A communication made as part of a public debate or forum that invites at least two (2) opposing candidates for public office or one (1) advocate and one (1) opponent of a ballot proposition or a communication that promotes the debate or forum and is made by or on behalf of the person sponsoring or hosting the debate or forum;

The act of producing or distributing an electioneering communication.

“Independent expenditure” means an expenditure that is made without consultation or coordination with a candidate, candidate’s campaign committee or the agent of a candidate or candidate’s campaign committee and which expressly advocates the:

Nomination, election or defeat of a candidate; or

Adoption or defeat of a ballot proposition.

“Organization”, as used in this chapter, means any corporation, partnership, trade union, professional association or civic, fraternal or religious group or other profit or nonprofit entity or any other entity influencing an election, except a political party, political action committee or candidate’s campaign committee.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.1; Laws 1985, ch. 204,§ 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 96, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 5; 2000, ch. 66, § 1; 2019 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 81, § 1, effective April 1, 2022.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 1, 2022, added (c); redesignated former (c) as (d); and added (d)(iv).

§ 22-25-102.
Contribution of funds or election assistance restricted; limitation on contributions; right to communicate; civil penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no organization except a political party, political action committee or candidate’s campaign committee, directly or indirectly through any officer, member, director or employee, shall contribute funds, other items of value or election assistance directly to any candidate or candidate’s campaign committee or to any political party or political action committee which directly coordinates with a candidate or a candidate’s campaign committee. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules to define direct coordination as prohibited by this section. No person shall solicit or receive a payment or contribution from an organization prohibited from making contributions under this subsection.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, only a natural person, political party, or a political action committee or a candidate’s campaign committee organized under W.S.

22-25-101

shall contribute funds or election assistance directly to any candidate or group of candidates. No person shall solicit or receive a political payment or contribution from any source other than a natural person, political party, political action committee or candidate’s campaign committee organized under W.S.

22-25-101

.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no individual other than the candidate, or the candidate’s immediate family shall contribute directly or indirectly:

To any candidate for statewide political office, or to any candidate for statewide political office’s candidate’s campaign committee:

More than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) per election; and

Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, no contribution for the general election may be given prior to the date for the primary election. This subparagraph shall not apply to any candidate unopposed in the primary election or nominated in accordance with W.S.

22-4-303

or

22-5-301

.

To any candidate for nonstatewide political office, or to any candidate for nonstatewide political office’s candidate’s campaign committee:

More than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) per election; and

Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, no contribution for the general election may be given prior to the date for the primary election. This subparagraph shall not apply to any candidate unopposed in the primary election or nominated in accordance with W.S.

22-4-303

or

22-5-301

.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 80 § 1.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 1, § 2.

Any violation of the provisions of subsection (a), (b), (c), (j), (m) or (n) of this section is subject to a civil penalty up to five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and costs including a reasonable attorney’s fee for a first violation and up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) and costs including a reasonable attorney’s fee for a second or subsequent violation which shall be imposed in a court of competent jurisdiction. The amount of penalty imposed shall be in such amount as will deter future actions of a similar nature. An action to impose the civil penalty may be prosecuted by and in the name of any candidate adversely affected by the transgression, any political party, any county attorney, any district attorney or the attorney general. Proceeds of the penalty collected shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

.

Direct contributions from any entity affiliated with a political party do not violate subsection (a) of this section. These contributions shall be a matter of internal party governance. Contributions to political parties are not subject to the limits of subsection (c) of this section provided the contributions are available to use as the appropriate party authorities choose and are not exclusively dedicated to any particular candidate. Contributions donated to a political party which are designated by the donor to be used only for a particular candidate and no other purpose are subject to the limitations of subsection (c) and of this section.

The prohibitions in this section do not apply to contributions of funds or other items of value to political parties for the purpose of supporting multi-state or national political party conferences or conventions. Any contribution made pursuant to this subsection shall also comply with all applicable federal election commission regulations governing contributions to political parties. Any political party which receives funds to sponsor such conferences or conventions shall file an itemized statement of contributions and expenditures with the secretary of state within ten (10) days after the conference or convention.

No organization, political party, political action committee or candidate’s campaign committee shall solicit or obtain contributions for any of the purposes specified in subsection (a) of this section from an individual on an automatic basis, including but not limited to a payroll deduction plan or reverse checkoff method, unless the individual who is contributing affirmatively consents in writing to the contribution. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize contributions otherwise prohibited under this election code.

For purposes of subsection (c) of this section the primary, general and special elections shall be deemed separate elections. No candidate for political office shall accept, directly or indirectly, contributions which violate subsection (c) of this section. Contributions to a candidate’s campaign committee shall be considered to be contributions to the candidate. Subsection (c) of this section does not limit political contributions by political parties, nor expenditures by a candidate from his own funds nor from his candidate’s campaign committee funds.

The prohibitions in this section shall not be construed to prohibit any organization from:

Exercising its first amendment rights to cause electioneering communications or independent expenditures to be made;

Bearing any portion of a political action committee’s administrative costs or costs of soliciting contributions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no political action committee shall contribute directly or indirectly more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per election to any candidate for political office other than statewide political office. For purposes of this subsection the primary, general and special elections shall be deemed separate elections. No candidate for political office shall accept, directly or indirectly, contributions which violate this subsection. Contributions to a candidate’s campaign committee shall be considered to be contributions to the candidate. This subsection does not limit political contributions by political parties, nor expenditures by a candidate from his own funds nor from his candidate’s campaign committee funds.

Contributions donated to a political action committee which are designated by the donor to be used only for a particular candidate and no other purpose are subject to the limitations of subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.2; Laws 1981 Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 96, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 157, § 2; 2009, ch. 174, § 1; 2011, ch. 74, § 1; 2013 ch. 189, § 1, effective January 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 80, § 1, effective March 2, 2015; 2015 ch. 160, § 1, effective March 9, 2015; 2019 ch. 1, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 81, § 1, effective April 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

substituted “penalty collected shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

” for “penalty imposed shall be credited to the state general fund” in (e).

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c), deleted “more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) per election during the two (2) year period consisting of a general election year and the preceding calendar year” following “directly or indirectly”, designated the existing language beginning with “to any candidate for political office” as (c)(i), and designated the existing language beginning with “total political contributions” as (c)(ii); in (c)(i), deleted “nor make more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00)” from the end; added (c)(i)(A) and (c)(i)(B); in (c)(ii), substituted “for any two (2) year period consisting of a general election year and the preceding calendar year, of more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00)” for “During the same two (2) year period. For purposes of this subsection the primary, general and special elections shall be deemed separate elections. No candidate for political office shall accept, directly or indirectly, contributions which violate this subsection. Contributions to a candidate's campaign committee shall be considered to be contributions to the candidate. This subsection does not limit political contributions by political parties, nor expenditures by a candidate from his or her own funds nor from his or her candidate's campaign committee funds”; in (e), in the first sentence, inserted “or (j)” preceding “of this section”; and added (j).

The 2011 amendment,

in (a), substituted “directly to any candidate or group of candidates” for “to aid, promote or prevent the nomination or election of any candidate or group of candidates or to aid or promote the interests, success or defeat of any political party” at the end of the first sentence; in (b), substituted “directly to any candidate or group of candidates” for “in order to aid, promote or prevent the nomination or election of any candidate or group of candidates or in order to aid or promote the interests, success or defeat of any political party”; and added (k).

Laws 2011, ch. 74 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2015, added new (c)(i), redesignating existing (c)(i) and (ii) as (c)(ii) and (iii); in (c)(ii), added “nonstatewide” and “candidate for nonstatewide political office’s,” substituted “one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) for “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) in (c)(ii)(A); substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000,00) in (c)(iii); in (e), added “(m) or (n),” making related changes and added “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and costs including a reasonable attorney’s fee for a first violation and up to” and “for a second or subsequent violation which shall be imposed in a court of competent jurisdiction;” in (h) deleted “at least once in every calendar year” at the end of the first sentence; and added (m) and (n).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first
2015 amendment, by ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in the last sentence in (g), substituted “contributions” for “receipts.

The second
2015 amendment, by ch. 80, § 1, repealed former (c)(ii), pertaining to contributions to nonstatewide political candidates.

Laws 2015, ch. 80, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

The third 2015 amendment, by ch. 160, § 1, in (k), added (i) and (ii); in (m) substituted “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)” for “seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500.00) to any candidate for statewide political office or three thousand dollars ($3,000.00)” and “other than statewide political office” for “other.”

Laws 2015, ch. 160, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
added “Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph” in the beginning and added the last sentence in (c)(i)(B) and (c)(ii)(B); and in (k)(i), substituted “cause electioneering communications” for “make,” and substituted “to be made” for “for speech expressly advocating the election or defeat of a candidate.
For purposes of this subsection, “independent expenditure“ means an expenditure that is made without consultation or coordination with a candidate or an agent of a candidate whose nomination or election the expenditure supports or whose opponent’s nomination or election the expenditure opposes” at the end.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (d), which read: "Any organization, in the aid of the election or defeat of candidates for public office or for the adoption or defeat of any ballot proposition may communicate directly with its own members on behalf of a particular candidate or political party."

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “candidate or candidate's campaign committee or to any political party or political action committee which directly coordinates with a candidate or a candidate's campaign committee. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules to define direct coordination as prohibited by this section” for “candidate or group of candidates.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 1, 2022, in the first sentence of (a), deleted “of any kind including a corporation, partnership, trade union, professional association or civic, fraternal or religious group or other profit or nonprofit entity” following “no organization” and “organized under W.S.

22-25-101

” preceding “directly or indirectly”; substituted “violation of” for “corporation, person or organization violating” in the first sentence of (e); substituted “entity” for “organization” in the first sentence of (f); substituted “political party, political action committee or candidate's campaign committee” for “of any kind, as specified in subsection (a) of this section,” in the first sentence of (h); and deleted “of any kind including a corporation, partnership, trade union, professional association or civic, fraternal or religious group or other profit or nonprofit entity” following “any organization” in (k).

Editor's notes.—

There is no section (i) or (l).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

Am Jur 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutional Validity of State or Local Regulation of Contributions by or to Political Action Committees. 24 A.L.R.6th 179.

§ 22-25-103.
Identifiable expenses; exceptions.

Identifiable expenses include:

All forms of advertising expenses, including, but not limited to, radio, television, billboards and posters;

Printing expenses;

Expenses for retaining the services of a professional campaign consultant, or public relations or management firm;

Postage.

Staff and postage expenses of a political party central committee, checking account service charges of a political action committee and a candidate’s personal campaign expenses for travel and meals and checking account service charges are not identifiable expenses.

Advertising expenses by a party central committee are not identifiable expenses for the candidate if the entire slate of candidates, below the national level, is advertised by the committee even though all candidates are not included in each advertisement so long as the expenses for each candidate on the slate are substantially the same in any election.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.3; Laws 1981, ch. 159, § 1.

§ 22-25-104.
Restriction on party funds in primary elections.

No political party funds shall be expended directly or indirectly in the aid of the nomination of any one person as against another person of the same political party running in the primary election.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.4.

§ 22-25-105.
Campaign reporting forms; instructions and warning.

The secretary of state shall prescribe the forms for reporting contributions and expenditures for primary, general and special election campaigns, together with written instructions for completing the form and a warning that violators are subject to criminal charges and civil penalties if the forms are not completed and filed pursuant to law. The forms along with instructions and warning shall be distributed to the county clerk and shall be made available, whether in electronic or paper form, by the county clerk to each person filing an application for nomination in his office and to each political action committee and candidate’s campaign committee required to file with the county clerk.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules to allow the forms required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and any other forms and reports required to be filed with him pursuant to this chapter to be filed electronically.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.5; 2008, ch. 64, § 1; 2013 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

in (a), added the designation (a), deleted “and furnish” after “shall prescribe” in the first sentence, added “Until January 1, 2010,” at the beginning of the second and third sentences; and added (b).

Laws 2008, ch. 64, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “after December 31, 2009” at the end in (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence in (a), substituted “contributions” for “receipts.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “civil penalties” for “that a vacancy will exist” in the first sentence, substituted “The” for “Until January 1, 2020” and “made available, whether in electronic or paper form” for “given” in the second sentence, and deleted the last sentence which read: “Until January 1, 2010, the county clerk shall also distribute the reporting forms to the chairmen of the county party central committees.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, ch. 64, § 2, provides: “There is appropriated two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00) from the general fund to the secretary of state. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purposes of establishing a system of electronic filing as provided in this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall not be included in the secretary of state's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request.”